Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1075
Confidential information.

Information provided by wireless carriers to the commission pursuant to the 911 Service System Act may be treated as records which may be withheld from the public upon request of the party submitting such records if the information qualifies under subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05.

Laws 2001, LB 585, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2212;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 268;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-467;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 57.